New York, session 2025-2026, S4075.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the assessor of the county of Richmond is hereby authorized to accept 3 from the Silver Lake Foundation Inc. an application for exemption from 4 real property taxes pursuant to section 420-a of the real property tax 5 law for the 2023 general taxes for the parcel conveyed to such organiza- 6 tion located at 203 Port Richmond Avenue, in the Borough of Staten 7 Island, County of Richmond, City and State of New York, otherwise known 8 as tax map section 5, block 1024, lot 3. If accepted, the application 9 shall be reviewed as if it had been received on or before the taxable 10 status date established for such roll. 11 If satisfied that such organization would otherwise be entitled to 12 such exemption if such organization had filed an application for 13 exemption by the appropriate taxable status date, the assessor, upon 14 approval by the New York City Council, may make appropriate correction 15 to the subject rolls. If such exemption is granted and such organiza- 16 tion, therefore, shall have paid any tax with respect to the subject 17 rolls, the applicable governing body or tax department may, in its sole 18 discretion, provide for the refund of those taxes paid and cancel those 19 taxes, fines, penalties, liens or interest remaining unpaid. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08349-02-6